New York, session 2025-2026, S9836.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 58 of the civil 2 service law, including the age requirements under paragraph (a) of 3 subdivision 1 of such section, or any other provision of law to the 4 contrary, John Raftery, who has been continuously employed by the town 5 of Shawangunk, in the county of Ulster, as a part-time police officer, 6 shall be eligible to take the competitive civil service examination for 7 the position of police officer and shall, contingent upon his score on 8 such examination, be eligible to be placed on the eligible list for 9 appointment as a full-time police officer with the town of Shawangunk 10 police department. 11 § 2. John Raftery shall otherwise be subject to the merit and fitness 12 provisions of the civil service law applicable to full-time police offi- 13 cers. 14 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15290-01-6